North Carolina, session 2025, SB324.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Commission for Public Health shall, no later than October 15,
2025:
(1) Commence rulemaking to establish maximum contaminant levels (MCLs), as
that term is defined under G.S. 130A-313, for probable or known carcinogens
and other toxic chemicals that are likely to pose a substantial hazard to public
health. At a minimum, the Commission shall establish MCLs for all of the
following contaminants:
a. Per- and poly-fluoroalkyl substances (PFAS).
b. Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA).
c. Perfluorooctane sulfonate (PFOS).
d. Hexavalent chromium (chromium-6).
e. 1,4-Dioxane.
(2) Consider establishment of MCLs for any other contaminants for which at least
two other states have set MCLs or issued guidance.
SECTION 1.(b) In the course of establishing MCLs as required by subsection (a) of
this section, the Commission shall:
(1) Review MCLs adopted by other states, the studies and scientific evidence
reviewed by those states, material in the Agency for Toxic Substances and
Disease Registry, and the latest peer-reviewed science and independent or
government agency studies on appropriate MCLs for such contaminants.
(2) Adopt MCLs protective of public health, including vulnerable subpopulations
such as pregnant and nursing mothers, infants, and children, which state
MCLs shall not exceed any MCL or health advisory established by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency.
SECTION 2. The Commission for Public Health shall annually review the latest
peer-reviewed science and independent or government agency studies and undertake additional
rulemaking as necessary to establish or revise MCLs for contaminants that are likely to pose a
substantial threat to public health.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S324-v-1*